Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 2. Uniform Accounting.

Administrative Code. —

For office of the commissioner, see 2 AAC 05.

Sec. 37.05.130.
General powers.

The Department of Administration is responsible for all accounts and purchases.

History.

(§ 1 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957)

Sec. 37.05.140.
Accounting system.

The Department of Administration shall maintain centralized accounting records that include the general and controlling accounts of the state. The state agencies shall prepare and transmit the documents prescribed by the department and shall submit the reports and statements required in order to carry out this chapter. Statistical or cost accounts related to the control accounts may be maintained by the department or by the agency as determined by the department, after consultation with the head of the agency concerned. Duplicate accounting records may not be maintained, except in the office of the Department of Administration as it directs.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 9 SLA 1994.]

[Repealed, § 18 ch 9 SLA 1994.]

The Department of Administration, after consultation with the head of the agency concerned, may decide not to maintain all or any part of the accounting records for an agency if the department finds that to do so would result in an appreciable loss of federal grant-in-aid funds to defray the administrative costs of maintaining the records.

History.

(§ 2 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957; am § 18 ch 9 SLA 1994)

Sec. 37.05.142.
Accounting for program receipts.

The Department of Administration shall establish and maintain separate accounts by program source for all program receipts that state agencies deposit under AS

37.10.050

or under another statute if the program receipts are exempted by law from the deposit requirements of AS

37.10.050

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Sec. 37.05.144.
Appropriations based on program receipts.

The annual estimated balance in each account maintained under AS

37.05.142

may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to state agencies to administer the programs generating the program receipts, to implement the laws related to the functions generating the program receipts, or to cover costs associated with the collection of the program receipts.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Sec. 37.05.146.
Definition of program receipts and non-general fund program receipts.

In AS

37.05.142

—

37.05.146

and AS

37.07.080

, “program receipts” means fees, charges, income earned on assets, and other state money received by a state agency in connection with the performance of its functions. Unless otherwise provided in this section, program receipts are accounted for within, and appropriated from, the general fund of the state.

The program receipts listed in this subsection are accounted for separately, and appropriations from these program receipts are not made from the unrestricted general fund:

federal receipts;

University of Alaska receipts ( AS

14.40.491

);

designated program receipts; in this paragraph, “designated program receipts” means money received by the state from a source other than the state or federal government that is restricted to a specific use by the terms of a gift, grant, bequest, or contract;

receipts of or from the trust established by AS

37.14.400

—

37.14.450

, except reimbursements described in AS

37.14.410

;

[Repealed § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018.]

The program receipts of the following are accounted for separately, and appropriations from these program receipts are not made from the unrestricted general fund:

highway working capital fund ( AS

44.68.210

);

loan funds;

international airports revenue fund ( AS

37.15.430

);

corporate receipts earned or managed by a public corporation of the state;

fish and game fund ( AS

16.05.100

);

school fund ( AS

43.50.140

);

training and building fund ( AS

23.20.130

);

retirement funds ( AS 14.25, AS 22.25, AS

26.05.222

, AS 39.35, and former AS 39.37);

permanent fund ( art. IX, sec. 15, Alaska Constitution);

public school trust fund ( AS

37.14.110

);

second injury fund ( AS

23.30.040

);

fishermen’s fund ( AS

23.35.060

);

FICA administration fund ( AS

39.30.050

);

receipts of the employee benefits program established under AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

;

receipts of the deferred compensation program established under AS 39.45;

clean air protection fund ( AS

46.14.260

);

receipts of the group insurance programs established under AS

39.30.090

;

mental health trust fund ( AS

37.14.031

);

Alaska children’s trust ( AS

37.14.200

);

commercial fisheries test fishing operations ( AS

16.05.050(a)(14)

);

Regulatory Commission of Alaska under AS 42.05, AS 42.06, and AS 42.08;

Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission under AS 31.05;

receipts of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development under AS

08.01.065

and from fines and penalties collected in licensing and disciplinary actions for occupations under AS

08.01.010

;

receipts from the seafood marketing assessment under AS

16.51.120

—

16.51.170

, and receipts of the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute;

the administrative cost charge under AS

44.33.113

for the state’s role in the federal community development quota program;

dive fishery management assessment receipts ( AS

43.76.150

), salmon fishery assessment receipts ( AS

43.76.220

), and permit buy-back assessment receipts ( AS

43.76.300

);

process service fees collected by the Department of Public Safety;

Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission under AS

16.05.490

,

16.05.530

, and AS 16.43;

receipts of the Alaska Vocational Technical Center;

Alaska Pioneers’ Home and Alaska Veterans’ Home care and support receipts under AS

47.55.030

;

receipts of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities from tolls charged for use of the Whittier Tunnel;

receipts of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, from license fees and fees for services;

receipts of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development from its functions relating to banking, securities, and corporations;

receipts of the Department of Corrections from the electronic prisoner monitoring program under AS

33.30.065(d)

;

receipts of the Department of Corrections from the operation of community residential centers;

receipts of the Alaska Police Standards Council;

receipts of the Department of Public Safety from fees for fire and life safety plan checks under AS

18.70.080(b)

;

receipts of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities from the measurement standards and commercial vehicle enforcement program;

receipts of the Department of Education and Early Development for teacher certification under AS

14.20.020

;

receipts of the Professional Teaching Practices Commission from professional certification fees;

receipts of the Department of Corrections from the inmate telephone system;

receipts of the Department of Public Safety from the Alaska automated fingerprint system under AS

44.41.025(b)

;

receipts of the Department of Administration from the boat registration and titling program under AS

05.25.096

;

state land disposal program ( AS

38.04.022

);

shore fisheries development lease program account ( AS

38.05.082(f)

);

timber receipts account ( AS

38.05.110

);

workers’ safety and compensation administration account ( AS

23.05.067

);

receipts of fees for recording and related services of the Department of Natural Resources ( AS

40.17.030(a)(10)

,

40.17.070

; AS

44.37.025(b)

,

44.37.027(c)

; AS

45.29.303(b)

,

45.29.525

, and

45.29.619(b)

);

receipts described in AS

46.03.482(b)(1)

and (2) received under the commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program;

receipts of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for fees for business licenses and license endorsements under AS 43.70;

receipts of fees for certain inspections deposited under AS

05.20.060

, AS

18.60.360

,

18.60.395

,

18.60.800

, and AS

18.62.030

in the building safety account created under AS

44.31.025

, and receipts of filing fees deposited under AS

18.60.270(d)

in the building safety account created under AS

44.31.025

;

passenger facility charges collected at state-owned and operated airports under Federal Aviation Administration guidelines;

money received by the Department of Environmental Conservation from the inspection of food under AS 17.20;

fees and other charges received by the Department of Natural Resources under AS

41.21.026

;

application and renewal fees received by the Department of Public Safety under AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

for licenses for security guards and security guard agencies;

fees received by the Department of Public Safety under AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

for the issuance, renewal, and replacement of permits to carry concealed handguns;

charges, rentals, and fees for airport or air navigation facility contracts, leases, and other arrangements under AS

02.15.020

and

02.15.090

;

fees for utility facility permits under AS

02.15.102

, encroachment permits under AS

02.15.106

, utility right-of-way permits under AS

19.25.010

, and utility facility permits under AS

35.10.210

;

recoveries of repair costs for damage to highway fixtures;

vehicle registration fees collected under AS

28.10.421

and other fees and charges collected under AS

28.10.441

;

fees for drivers’ licenses, drivers’ permits, renewals, and driver skills tests collected under AS

28.15.271

;

user fees and other fees collected by the Department of Education and Early Development under AS

14.57.010

;

student tuition and other fees related to schools that are operated by the state and collected under AS

14.07.030

;

receipts of fees for registration and renewal of registration for the sale of business opportunities under AS

45.66.040

;

emission control permit receipts account ( AS

46.14.265

);

workers’ compensation benefits guaranty fund ( AS

23.30.082

);

receipts of the Department of Environmental Conservation from the registration of pesticides and broadcast chemicals and the licensing of pesticide applicators under AS

44.46.025

;

proceeds from prison employment, including deductions from prisoner wages for the cost of confinement under AS

33.30.201(b)

and forfeited wages under AS

33.30.201(e)

;

fees collected under AS

18.74.080

;

civil legal services fund under AS

37.05.590

;

donations to the anatomical gift awareness fund under AS

13.50.150

;

crime victim compensation fund ( AS

18.67.162

);

gifts, donations, and grants received by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs for the purpose of establishing and maintaining Alaska veterans’ cemeteries under AS

26.10.030

and AS

44.35.035(b)

;

fines imposed and collected under AS

12.55.035

;

the vaccine assessment fund under AS

18.09.230

;

fees collected by the Department of Natural Resources, division of geological and geophysical surveys, under AS

41.08.045

;

the following fees, receipts, income, and monetary recoveries collected by the Department of Health and Social Services:

receipts of the Department of Health and Social Services, Bureau of Vital Statistics;

monetary recoveries of Medicaid expenditures from recipients, third parties, and providers under AS 47;

the state’s share of overpayments collected under AS

47.05.080

;

income received from a state or federal agency for children in foster care under AS

47.14.100

;

fees received or collected under AS

44.29.022

for nursing and planning services provided at health centers, genetic screening clinics and specialty clinics, the certification of x-ray machines, the alcohol safety action program, and other public health programs and services;

fees received under AS

18.08.080

for the certification or licensure of emergency medical technicians, emergency medical dispatchers, mobile intensive care paramedics, and emergency medical technician instructors;

fees received under AS 47.32;

the state’s share of child support collections for reimbursement of the cost of the Alaska temporary assistance program as provided under AS

25.27.120

,

25.27.130

, and AS

47.27.040

; and

monetary recoveries under AS 09.58 (Alaska Medical Assistance False Claim and Reporting Act);

fees collected by the Department of Natural Resources under AS

03.05.010(d)

;

civil penalties collected under AS

30.30.015

, money received from the sale of vessels under AS 30.30, and donations and other receipts deposited to the derelict vessel prevention program fund under AS

30.30.096

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 8 ch 14 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 8 ch 88 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 1 FSSLA 1992; am § 115 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 11 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 64 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 10 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 31 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 25 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 34 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 89 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 1 FSSLA 2001; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 2001; am §§ 4, 5 ch 96 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 134 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 135 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 15 ch 31 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 59 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 87 SLA 2004; am § 68 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am § 21 ch 14 SLA 2005; am § 8 ch 36 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2005; am § 14 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 87 SLA 2005; am §§ 3, 4 ch 89 SLA 2005; am §§ 9, 10 ch 58 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 61 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 2007; am § 35 ch 100 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 21 SLA 2009; am § 2 ch 110 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 4 ch 30 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 11 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018; am §§ 1, 4 ch 68 SLA 2018; am § 10 ch 103 SLA 2018; am §§ 31, 32 ch 111 SLA 2018; am § 5 ch 17 SLA 2019; am § 17 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2004, in various paragraphs of (c) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Paragraph (c)(89) was enacted as (c)(88); renumbered in 2016.

In 2002, multiple paragraphs of subsection (b) were renumbered as paragraphs of subsection (c).

In 2004, 2005, and 2018, paragraphs in subsection (c) were renumbered to remove repealed provisions and in 1999, 2005, and 2010, references to other sections were conformed to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, in (c), added (88) [repealed in 2018].

The second 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, in (c)(56) [now (c)(54)], inserted “and other charges” following “fees” and deleted “for the use of state park system facilities”.

The third 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, in (c), added (88) [now (c)(76)].

The first 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (c)(53) [now (c)(51)], added “, and receipts of filing fees deposited under AS

18.60.270(d)

in the building safety account created under AS

44.31.025

.” at the end.

The second 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, repealed (b)(5).

The third 2018 amendment, effective October 22, 2018, repealed (c)(42), (59) — (67), (71), and (88), added (c)(90) [now (c)(77)].

The fourth 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (c)(90) [now (c)(78)].

The fifth 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (c)(45) [now (c)(43)], inserted “and titling” following “boat registration”; added (c)(90) [now (c)(79)].

The 2019 amendment, effective August 9, 2019, substituted “vaccine assessment fund” for “vaccine assessment account” in (c)(75).

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (c)(77)(F), inserted “or licensure” following “certification” and “mobile intensive care paramedics,” following “emergency medical dispatchers,”.

Editor's notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter concerning the amendment of this section by § 4,
ch. 59, SLA 1997 (HCS CSSB 55(FIN)), see 1997 Senate Journal 69.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2005 (SB 52), amending (c)(34) of this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 42 — 43.

Sec. 37.05.150.
Funds and accounts.

The accounting system shall be in accordance with accepted principles of governmental (fund) accounting and shall include both budgetary and property accounts.
The system must provide records showing at all times by funds, accounts, and other pertinent classifications the amounts appropriated, the estimated revenue, actual revenue or receipts, the amounts available for expenditure, the total expenditures, the unliquidated obligations, actual balances on hand, and the unencumbered balances of appropriations for each state agency.

History.

(§ 3 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957)

Sec. 37.05.151.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.500.]

Sec. 37.05.152.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.510.]

Sec. 37.05.153.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.520.]

Sec. 37.05.156.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.540.]

Secs. 37.05.157, 37.05.158.
Reserve for capital outlay account; reserve for energy facilities development account. [Repealed, § 62 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 37.05.159.
Reserve for emergency operating expenses account. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 37.05.160.
Property records.

The Department of Administration shall direct the use of inventory records by all state agencies to show all fixed and movable property of the state.
The records must be based on a physical inventory and charged with all subsequent purchases and shall be reduced by all property traded in, condemned, or disposed of.
The accuracy of the property record shall be verified periodically by actual inspection of the property by the department.
The state agencies may be required to take physical inventory of properties annually and at other times as the department directs.

History.

(§ 4 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For supply management, see 2 AAC 12, art. 12.

Sec. 37.05.165.
Petty cash accounts.

The Department of Administration shall determine the amount of the petty cash accounts needed by each state agency and inspect the petty cash accounts at least once each year to determine that the total plus amounts of receipts for unreplenished disbursements is equal to the fixed sum of cash set aside.
Shortages in petty cash accounts are a personal liability of the responsible head of the agency to whom the account is set aside.
The department shall adopt necessary regulations governing use and replenishment of petty cash funds.

History.

(§ 38 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 37.05.232. Renumbered in 1986.

Sec. 37.05.170.
Restrictions on payments and obligations.

Payment may not be made and obligations may not be incurred against a fund unless the Department of Administration certifies that its records disclose that there is a sufficient unencumbered balance available in the fund and that an appropriation or expenditure authorization has been made for the purpose for which it is intended to incur the obligation.

History.

(§ 5 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957)

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section implements Alaska Const., art. IX, § 13. Pursuant to both provisions, a state official may not enter into an unqualified indemnification agreement in the absence of an existing appropriation to cover the potential payment that may be required of the state. However, in some instances, unique commercial realities might compel some accommodation for requests for indemnification.
In such cases, the state may agree to indemnify, if the indemnification agreement (1) clearly explains that the decision of whether to appropriate funds necessary to pay the liability is within the unfettered discretion of the legislature, and (2) is entered only with the approval of high level state officials and the concurrence of the attorney general or deputy attorney general. 2005 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 23.

Sec. 37.05.180.
Limitation on payment of warrants.

A warrant upon the state treasury may not be paid unless presented at the office of the commissioner of revenue within six months of the date of its issuance. A warrant not presented within that time is presumed abandoned, except where the warrant is for the payment of a permanent fund dividend or a benefit payment or refund under AS 14.25, AS 22.25, AS 26.05, AS 39.30, AS 39.35, former AS 39.37, or AS 39.45. Money held for an abandoned warrant shall be delivered to the custody of the Department of Revenue to be administered as unclaimed property under AS 34.45.

History.

(§ 3 ch 130 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 4 SLA 1992; am § 26 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 2003; am § 21 ch 99 SLA 2004)

Sec. 37.05.190.
Pre-audit of claims.

The Department of Administration shall examine and audit every receipt, account, bill, claim, refund, and demand on the funds in the state treasury arising from activities carried on by state agencies. It shall determine whether or not the obligation is incurred in accordance with laws and regulations adopted under authority of law, and that the amount is correct and is unpaid.

The department may not approve for payment an account, bill, claim, refund, or demand on funds in the state treasury unless the claim is ordered by act of the legislature or is contracted against the state by an authorized officer or agent of the state.

History.

(§ 6 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For grant administration, see 2 AAC 45.

Sec. 37.05.200.
Pre-audit of receipts.

The Department of Revenue shall transmit to the Department of Administration copies of receipt documents showing all receipts received by the Department of Revenue.
The receipt documents shall be audited, examined, and the amounts entered in the proper accounts in the records of the Department of Administration.
The Department of Administration may adopt regulations to establish the system for providing current receipt documents.

History.

(§ 7 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957)

Sec. 37.05.210.
Fiscal reporting and statistics.

The Department of Administration shall

file with the governor and with the legislative auditor before December 16 a report of the financial transactions of the preceding fiscal year and of the financial condition of the state as of the end of that year, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and audited by the legislative auditor in accordance with generally accepted audit standards, with comments and supplementary data that the Department of Administration considers necessary; this report shall be printed for the information of the legislature and the public;

compile statistics necessary for the budget and other statistics required by the governor;

file a travel and compensation report with the legislature by January 31 of each year containing detailed information for the previous calendar year of the salaries, per diem, travel expenses, relocation expenses, and any additional allowances for

the governor, the lieutenant governor, and the chiefs of staff of the governor and lieutenant governor;

the president and vice-president of the University of Alaska and the chancellors of the individual campuses of the university;

the commissioners or other executive heads of the principal departments in the executive branch of state government, and the deputy commissioners and division directors in those departments; and

the executive heads of public corporations created by law, including the Alaska Railroad Corporation.

By January 21 of each year, the University of Alaska and each public corporation shall provide the information related to salaries, per diem, travel expenses, relocation expenses, and any additional allowances to the Department of Administration in the form and manner prescribed by the department.

History.

(§ 8 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1965; am § 79 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 14 ch 126 SLA 1994; am §§ 3, 4 ch 83 SLA 1999)